Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2104
Prohibited acts.

No person shall, in connection with the offering, sale, or lease of an interest in a membership campground:

(1) Employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud;

(2) Make any untrue statement of a material fact;

(3) Fail to state a material fact necessary to make a statement clear;

(4) Issue, circulate, or publish any prospectus, circular, advertisement, printed matter, document, pamphlet, leaflet, or other literature containing an untrue statement of a material fact or that fails to state a material fact necessary to make the statements on the literature clear; or

(5) Issue, circulate, or publish any advertising matter or make any written representation unless the name of the person issuing, circulating, or publishing the matter or making the representation is clearly indicated.

Laws 1990, LB 656, § 4;

Laws 2024, LB152, § 2.